California, session 20252026, AB1486.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33319.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:33319.1. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may advance a payment for a contract or agreement made with the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to Section 93570 of the Public Resources Code in the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years. A contract or agreement made by the department with the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to Section 93570 of the Public Resources Code in those fiscal years shall be exempt from the requirement of approval by the Director of General Services pursuant to Section 11256 of the Government Code.(b) For purposes of a contract or agreement specified in subdivision (a), developing a research farm pursuant to Section 93570 of the Public Resources Code includes both of the following:(1) Constructing a new research farm.(2) Maintaining, altering, or improving an existing research farm previously constructed by the Agricultural Experiment Station or the Agricultural Research Institute.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 93570 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:93570. Of the funds made available by Section 93500, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, for purposes of providing grants to public postsecondary educational institutions that are designated by the University of California and the California State University as Agricultural Experiment Stations or Agricultural Research Institutes, to develop research farms to improve climate resiliency. Funding provided pursuant to this section shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per institution and shall be constructed and maintained with environmentally sustainable infrastructure practices.